ko: 염색 상태: 표백/흰색; 염색 (단색); 염색 (다색); 수작업 염색; 헤더; 프린트; 무염색/천연; 기타
de: Färbestatus: Gebleicht/Weiß; Gefärbt (einfarbig); Gefärbt (mehrfarbig/meliert); Handgefärbt; Meliert; Bedruckt; Ungefärbt / Natur; Sonstige
pl: Status barwienia: Bielony / biały; Barwiony (jednolity); Barwiony (wielokolorowy); Ręcznie barwiony; Melanżowy; Z nadrukiem; Niebarwiony / naturalny; Inny
lt-LT: Dažymo būsena: Balinta / balta; Dažyta (vienspalvė); Dažyta (marginta); Dažyta rankomis; Melanžinė; Spausdinta; Nedažyta / natūrali; Kita
tr: Boya durumu: Ağartılmış/beyaz; Boyalı (düz); Boyalı (alacalı); El boyaması; Kırçıllı; Baskılı; Boyasız / doğal; Diğer
zh-CN: 染料状态: 漂白/白色; 染色（纯色）; 染色（杂色）; 手工染色; 花纱染色; 印花; 未染色/自然色; 其他
th: สถานะการย้อมสี: ฟอกสี/สีขาว; ย้อมสี (สีพื้น); ย้อมสี (สีเหลือบ); ย้อมด้วยมือ; สีผสม (Heathered); พิมพ์ลาย; ไม่ย้อมสี / ธรรมชาติ; อื่นๆ
cs: Barevná úprava: Bělené/bílé; Barvené (jednobarevné); Barvené (žíhané); Ručně barvené; Melírované; Potištěné; Nebarvené / přírodní; Ostatní
nb: Fargestoffstatus: Bleket/hvit; Farget (ensfarget); Farget (flerfarget); Håndfarget; Melert; Trykt; Ufarget / naturlig; Annet
sv: Färgstatus: Blekt/vit; Färgad (enfärgad); Färgad (melerad); Handfärgad; Melerad; Tryckt; Ofärgad/naturlig; Övrigt
zh-TW: 染色狀態: 漂白/白色; 染色 (單色); 染色 (漸層/多色); 手工染色; 混色; 印花; 未染色 / 自然色; 其他
hr-HR: Status boje: Izbijeljeno/bijelo; Bojano (jednobojno); Bojano (šareno); Ručno bojano; Melirano; Tiskano; Nebojano / prirodno; Ostalo
fr: État de teinture: Blanchi/blanc; Teint (uni); Teint (nuancé); Teint à la main; Chiné; Imprimé; Non teint / naturel; Autre
es: Estado del tinte: Blanqueado/blanco; Teñido (sólido); Teñido (matizado); Teñido a mano; Jaspeado; Estampado; Sin teñir / natural; Otro
hu: Festék állapota: Fehérített/fehér; Festett (egyszínű); Festett (tarkán); Kézzel festett; Melírozott; Nyomtatott; Festetlen / natúr; Egyéb
sl-SI: Stanje barvanja: Beljeno/belo; Barvano (enobarvno); Barvano (večbarvno); Ročno barvano; Melirano; Tiskano; Nebarvano/naravno; Drugo
pt-BR: Estado de tingimento: Alvejado/branco; Tingido (sólido); Tingido (mesclado); Tingido à mão; Matizado; Estampado; Não tingido / natural; Outro
en: Dye status: Bleached/white; Dyed (solid); Dyed (variegated); Hand-dyed; Heathered; Printed; Undyed / natural; Other
sk-SK: Stav farbenia: Bielené/biele; Farbené (jednofarebné); Farbené (melírované); Ručne farbené; Melírované; Potlačené; Nefarbené / prírodné; Iné
el: Κατάσταση χρωστικής: Λευκασμένο/λευκό; Βαμμένο (μονόχρωμο); Βαμμένο (πολύχρωμο/ντεγκραντέ); Βαμμένο στο χέρι; Μελανζέ; Τυπωμένο; Άβαφο / φυσικό; Άλλο
nl: Verf status: Gebleekt/wit; Geverfd (effen); Geverfd (gemêleerd); Handgeverfd; Gemêleerd; Bedrukt; Ongeverfd/natuurlijk; Anders
ro-RO: Stare colorant: Înălbit/Alb; Vopsit (uniform); Vopsit (pestriț); Vopsit manual; Melanj; Imprimat; Nevopsit / Natural; Altele
ru: Статус окрашивания: Отбеленная/белая; Окрашенная (однотонная); Окрашенная (многоцветная); Окрашенная вручную; Меланжевая; С принтом; Неокрашенная / натуральная; Другое
bg-BG: Състояние на багрилото: Избелени/бели; Боядисани (едноцветни); Боядисани (пъстри); Ръчно боядисани; Меланж; Щамповани; Небоядисани / естествени; Друго
da: Farvestofstatus: Bleget/hvid; Farvet (ensfarvet); Farvet (meleret); Håndfarvet; Meleret; Trykt; Ufarvet / naturlig; Andet
pt-PT: Estado do corante: Branqueado/branco; Tingido (sólido); Tingido (matizado); Tingido à mão; Mesclado; Estampado; Sem tingimento/natural; Outro
vi: Tình trạng nhuộm màu: Tẩy trắng/trắng; Nhuộm (đơn sắc); Nhuộm (đa sắc); Nhuộm thủ công; Nhuộm màu xước; In họa tiết; Không nhuộm / tự nhiên; Khác
it: stati di tintura: Sbiancato/bianco; Tinto (a tinta unita); Tinto (variegato); Tinto a mano; Mélange; Stampato; Non tinto / naturale; Altro
ja: 染色状態: 漂白/白; 染色 (単色); 染色 (段染め); 手染め; 杢; プリント; 無染色 / ナチュラル; その他
fi: Värjäys: Valkaistu/valkoinen; Värjätty (yksivärinen); Värjätty (monivärinen); Käsinvärjätty; Meleerattu; Painettu; Värjäämätön / luonnollinen; Muu